Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 83 The Rhode Island Middle School Reform Act of 2004

16-83-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Middle School Reform Act of 2004.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 452, § 1.

16-83-2.
Legislative findings.

It is hereby found and declared as follows:

The importance of education and the need to educate our children to ensure the future of our state’s work force and economic development is one of the major goals of the general assembly; and

Our state’s top educators have been calling for school reform that will help produce a higher performing public school that best meets the educational needs of students; and

The governor is calling upon our state’s business leaders to join the crusade for school change and reform by becoming involved in school issues and by being part of the solution to help improve our public schools.

The business education roundtable has been a catalyst for the involvement of our business leaders in school reform; and

The school improvement report of 2001 found that a significant number of Rhode Island middle schools performed poorly. In addition, the 2002 middle school performance analysis showed similar results; and

The “Rhode Island Middle School Reform Act of 2004” is designed to improve education in all the middle schools in Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 452, § 1.

16-83-3.
School committees — Implementation of policy.

Every school committee in every city or town shall initiate policy intended to improve the educational performance of its middle schools. Said policy shall include the following criteria:

Encourage the redesign of its middle schools. Such a redesign effort should include all of the key elements of reformed middle schools, particularly time for team planning at least three (3) times per week and occurring during the school day.

Encourage the professional development of all middle school teachers to better prepare them to successfully deal with the challenges of educating the middle school student.

Encourage after-school social and recreational programs at its middle schools to better engage and connect the middle school students to their school.

Encourage extended day academic tutorial programs for all students performing below standard in English, language arts and mathematics.

Encourage the training of parents and community organizations to better prepare them to address the numerous needs of middle school students when they are not in school.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 452, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 82.